District of Columbia statutes.
24-467

Exceptions.

Persons convicted of first degree murder or persons sentenced for crimes committed when armed under § 22-4502, or under § 22-4504(b), or under § 22-2803, shall not be eligible for geriatric parole or geriatric suspension of sentence.

History

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 8, 40 DCR 792
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 57, 40 DCR 6311
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 18, 41 DCR 5193
May 25, 1995, D.C. Law 10-258, § 2, 42 DCR 238
June 15, 2013, D.C. Law 19-318, § 2(a), 59 DCR 12469

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-267.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-318 substituted “or under § 22-2803” for “and § 22-2803”; and substituted “eligible for geriatric parole or geriatric suspension of sentence” for “eligible for geriatric or medical parole.”